Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20173-147
Airports; acquisition of land; purpose.

The acquisition of any lands for the purpose of establishing airports or other air navigation facilities; the acquisition of any airport protection privileges; the acquisition, establishment, construction, enlargement, improvement, maintenance, equipment, and operation of airports and other air navigation facilities, whether by the state separately or jointly with any municipality, municipalities, or any person owning a privately owned public use airport; the assistance of this state in any such acquisition, establishment, construction, enlargement, improvement, maintenance, equipment, and operation; and the exercise of any other powers granted to the division are hereby declared to be public and governmental functions exercised for a public purpose and matters of public necessity. Such lands and other property and privileges acquired are declared to be public property.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 12, p. 99;

Laws 1995, LB 609, § 12;

Laws 2001, LB 173, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 40.
July 1, 2017